Alabama, session 2026rs, HB131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-6-350, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-350
(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish an
Alabama Veteran Tag Program to recognize certain veterans.
(b)(1) The owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident
Page 1

(b)(1) The owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident
HB131 INTRODUCED
of this state and who is an eligible veteran pursuant to
subsection (c) may be issued a distinctive license tag
pursuant to this division. The veteran shall: (i) make
application to the judge of probate or commissioner of
licenses,; (ii) comply with state motor vehicle laws relating
to registration and licensing of motor vehicles,; (iii) pay
the regular license fee for a tag as provided by law for a
private passenger or pleasure motor vehicle,; and (iv) pay an
additional fee of three dollars ($3) for the initial issuance
of the tag except a Vietnam veteran's tag.
(2) In the case of a Vietnam veteran's tag, the
additional fee for the initial issuance of the tag shall be
six dollars ($6), three dollars ($3) of which shall be
distributed to the Vietnam Veterans of America, Inc., Alabama
State Council, to be used to assist Vietnam veterans. For each
renewal year, an additional fee of three dollars ($3) shall be
paid for the Vietnam veterans tag. The additional fee of three
dollars ($3) shall be distributed to the Vietnam Veterans of
America, Inc., Alabama State Council, to be used to assist
Vietnam veterans.
(c) The distinctive license tags in the Alabama Veteran
Tag Program shall include all of the following:
(1)veterans Veterans of the United States Armed Forces
exposed to dangerous levels of radiation due to the atomic
bomb and weapon testing from 1944 to 1962, who:
a. Directly participated in the detonation of an atomic
weapon or device;
b. Directly participated in the cleanup of radioactive
Page 2

b. Directly participated in the cleanup of radioactive
HB131 INTRODUCED
material resulting from any atmospheric detonation of or
accident associated with an atomic weapon; or
c. Were exposed to ionizing radiation resulting from
the operational use of atomic weapons during World War II.
(2) Vietnam veterans,.
(3) Korean War veterans,.
(4) World War II veterans,.
(5) veterans Veterans of the Battle of the Bulge,.
(6) veterans Veterans of Desert Shield/Desert Storm,
Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm.
(7) veterans Veterans of Operation Iraqi Freedom,.
(8) veterans Veterans of Operation Enduring
Freedom-Afghanistan,.
(9) veterans Veterans of the Cold War serving at any
time between September 2, 1945, and December 26, 1991, and.
(10) veterans Veterans of Operation Inherent Resolve.
(d) The distinctive tags shall be issued, printed, and
processed in the same manner as other distinctive tags as
provided in this chapter. The payment of the required motor
vehicle license fees and taxes when required by this section
for a year during which a new vehicle license plate is not
issued shall be evidenced as provided in Section 32-6-63.
(d)(e) The Vietnam Veterans of America, Inc., Alabama
State Council, for the Vietnam veterans distinctive tag, and
the Department of Veterans' Veterans Affairs for the other
distinctive veteran tags shall each respectively design or
have designed the distinctive veteran tags, subject to
approval by the Commissioner of Revenue and compliance with
Page 3

approval by the Commissioner of Revenue and compliance with
HB131 INTRODUCED
all laws and rules. An applicant for a Vietnam veteran tag
shall be a Vietnam era veteran, and the local veteran's
affairs officer in the county in which application is made for
the distinctive tag shall certify all Vietnam veterans
eligible for a Vietnam veteran distinctive tag. An applicant
for other veteran distinctive tags shall be a veteran of the
appropriate conflict or otherwise qualify for a veteran tag as
authorized by this section, and shall be certified as eligible
by the Department of Veterans Affairs.
(e)(f) The distinctive license tags shall not be
transferable between motor vehicle owners and shall be subject
to the same provisions of law related to the transferring of
distinctive motor vehicle tags provided in Section 32-6-154 or
as otherwise provided by law or rule of the Department of
Revenue."
100 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
101 1, 2026.
Page 4